District of Columbia statutes.
38-2103

Filing and publication of contracts.

True copies of all contracts made on behalf of the District of Columbia pursuant to the Agreement shall be kept on file in the office of the Board of Education of the District of Columbia and in the office of the Mayor of the District of Columbia. The Superintendent of Schools shall publish all such contracts in convenient form.

Dec. 7, 1974, 88 Stat. 1615, Pub. L. 93-515, title I, § 103

History

1981 Ed., § 31-1303.
1973 Ed., § 31-1803.

Prior Codifications

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.

Change in Government